Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Article 5. Liability for Injury or Death of Employee

Cross references. —

As to venue in connection with actions against railroad companies, see §

1-5-106

.

For provision that nothing contained in the provisions relating to labor and employment as applied to the inspection and application of safety devices shall be construed to be applicable to railroads engaged in interstate commerce and workshops connected therewith, see §

27-1-104

.

§ 37-9-501.
Death or injury due to negligence.

Every person or corporation operating a railroad in the state shall be liable in damages to any person suffering injury while he is employed by the person or corporation so operating any railroad, or, in case of the death of an employee, instantaneously, or otherwise, to his or her personal representative, for the benefit of the surviving widow or husband and children of the employee; and, if none, then of the employee’s parents; and, if none, then of the next of kin dependent upon the employee, for the injury or death resulting in whole or in part from the negligence of any of the officers, agents, or employees of the person or corporation so operating the railroad in or about the handling, movement, or operation of any train, engine, or car, on or over the railroad, or by reason of any defect or insufficiency, due to its negligence, in its cars, engines, appliances, machinery, track, roadbed, works, or other equipment.

History.

Laws 1913, ch. 132, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 5386; R.S. 1931, § 96-201; C.S. 1945, § 65-501; W.S. 1957, § 37-224; Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “employees of the person” for “employers of such person,” and made stylistic changes throughout.

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Pleadings. —

Petition in action against railroad for negligence causing death of employee is demurrable where personal representative and mother of deceased joined as plaintiffs, statute giving right of action to the personal representative of deceased. McKasson v. Union P. R. Co., 278 F. 303, 1922 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 910 (D. Wyo. 1922).

Law reviews. —

For an address on solicitation of claims under Federal Employers Liability Act, see 1 Wyo. L.J. 22.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Defect in appliance or equipment as proximate cause of injury to railroad employee in repair or investigation thereof, 30 ALR2d 1192.

Injury while crossing or walking along railroad or street railway tracks, going to or from work, as arising out of and in the course of employment, 50 ALR2d 363.

Duty of railroad company toward employees with respect to close clearance of objects alongside track, 50 ALR2d 674.

Surface of yard, duty of railroad company to prevent injury of employee due to, 57 ALR2d 493.

Application of doctrine of res ipsa loquitur in action under Federal Employers' Liability Act for injury to or death of employee riding train resulting from sudden stop, start, or jerk of train, 60 ALR2d 637.

Proximate cause as affecting liability of railroad company for failure to care for or to furnish medical aid to servant stricken by illness or injury, 64 ALR2d 1108.

Circumstances justifying state court's refusal to take jurisdiction of Federal Employers' Liability Act proceeding, 60 ALR3d 964.

Liability of land carrier to passenger who becomes victim of third party's assault on or about carrier's vehicle or premises, 34 ALR4th 1054.

Recovery of prejudgment interest in actions under the Federal Employers' Liability Act or Jones Act, 80 ALR Fed 185.

Excessiveness or adequacy of awards of damages for personal injury or death in actions under Federal Employers' Liability Act (45 USC § 51 et seq.)—modern cases, 97 ALR Fed 189.

§ 37-9-502.
Contributory negligence.

In all actions hereafter brought against any such person or corporation so operating such railroad, under and by virtue of any of the provisions of this act [§§

37-9-501

through

37-9-504

], the fact that the employee may have been guilty of contributory negligence shall not bar a recovery, but the damages shall be diminished by the jury in proportion to the amount of negligence attributable to such employee; provided, that no such employee who may be injured or killed shall be held to have been guilty of contributory negligence in any case where the violation by such person or corporation so operating such railroad, of any statute enacted for the safety of employees contributed to the injury or death of such employee.

History.

Laws 1913, ch. 132, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 5387; R.S. 1931, § 96-202; C.S. 1945, § 65-502; W.S. 1957, § 37-225.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Comparative Negligence in Wyoming,” see VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 597 (1973).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Contributory negligence of railroad employee in jumping from moving train or car to avoid collision or other injury, 58 ALR2d 1232.

§ 37-9-503.
Assumption of risk.

Any employee of any such person or corporation so operating such railroad shall not be deemed to have assumed any risk incident to his employment when such risk arises by reason of the negligence of his employer or of any person in the service of such employer.

History.

Laws 1913, ch. 132, § 3; C.S. 1920, § 5388; R.S. 1931, § 96-203; C.S. 1945, § 65-503; W.S. 1957, § 37-226.

Assumption of risk. —

An experienced boilermaker who knows best all the hazards and dangers surrounding repair work under a diversity of conditions assumed risk in employment out of which injury arose, precluding his recovery. Grosscupp v. Chicago & N. W. R. Co., 14 F. Supp. 276, 1936 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 1298 (D. Wyo. 1936).

Cited

in

Chicago & N.W. Ry. v. Ott, 33 Wyo. 200, 237 P. 238,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(1925).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Assumption of risk as affecting railroad employer's liability for injury or death of employee, based on failure to furnish assistance to employee, 36 ALR2d 8.

§ 37-9-504.
Contracts restricting liability void.

Any contract, rule, or regulation or device whatsoever, the purpose or intent of which shall be to enable any such person or corporation, so operating such railroad to exempt itself from any liability created by this act [§§

37-9-501

through

37-9-504

] shall, to that extent, be void. Nor shall any contract of insurance, relief, benefit or indemnity in case of injury or death, entered into prior to the injury, between the person so injured and such corporation, or any person or association acting for such corporation, nor shall the acceptance of any such insurance, relief, benefit, or indemnity by the person injured, his widow, heirs, or legal representatives after the injury, from such corporation, person or association, constitute any bar or defense to any cause of action brought under the provisions of this act, but nothing herein contained shall be construed to prevent or invalidate any settlement for damages between the employer and the employees subsequent to injuries received.

History.

Laws 1913, ch. 132, § 4; C.S. 1920, § 5389; R.S. 1931, § 96-204; C.S. 1945, § 65-504; W.S. 1957, § 37-227.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision that no law shall be enacted limiting the amount of damages to be recovered for causing the injury or death of any person and providing that any contract or agreement with any employee waiving any right to recover damages for causing the death or injury of any employee shall be void, see art. 10, § 4, Wyo. Const.

For constitutional provision prohibiting contracts exempting employer from liability for personal injuries, see art. 19, § 7, Wyo. Const.

For another provision declaring contracts exempting employer from liability void, see §

27-1-105

.

§ 37-9-505.
Two-way radios required; penalty.

When a railroad train is operated in Wyoming with a caboose, it shall be equipped with operable, two-way radios located in the lead locomotive and in the caboose. The radios shall have and be operated at the same frequency as the control operator on the railroad on which the train is operated if the control operator is equipped with radios.

When a railroad train is operated in Wyoming without a caboose, the train crews shall be supplied with an operable, portable two-way radio. The radio shall have and be operated at the same frequency as the control operator on the railroad on which the train is operated if the control operator is equipped with radios.

Violation of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00). Each train operating without the required radios is a separate violation.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 106, § 1.